District of Columbia statutes.
5-1415

Repealed

Tissue transplants.

Repealed.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2916, 47 DCR 6308
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 30(b), 55 DCR 2532
1981 Ed., § 11-2312.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2916 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).